Missouri, session 2026, SB958.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.088, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 144.088,
to read as follows:
144.088. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Sales invoice", any document, in either paper or
electronic format, which lists items to be sold as part of a
sales transaction and states the prices of such items; and
(2) "Sales receipt", any document, in either paper or
electronic format, which lists items sold as part of a sales
transaction and states the prices of such items.
2. Any seller who sells more than five hundred
thousand dollars worth of goods per year and provides a
purchaser with a sales receipt or sales invoice in
conjunction with a sale, as defined under section 144.010,
shall clearly state on such sales receipt or sales invoice
the total rate of all sales tax imposed on the sale
referenced by such document. This total rate shall reflect
any applicable state or local sales tax authorized under the
laws of this state.

SB 958 2
3. All sellers who provide a sales invoice or a sales
receipt in conjunction with a sale, as defined in section
144.010, shall clearly state on such sales invoice or sales
receipt the total cost of any tariff imposed on the sale of
such goods.
✓